New Jersey, session 222, S3617.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Every State, county, and municipal law enforcement officer shall be authorized to access a crime scene and any evidence at the location of the crime scene which is under the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency that employs the officer. b.  Any person, including a federal law enforcement officer, who prevents a State, county, or municipal law enforcement officer from accessing a crime scene or any evidence at a crime scene as set forth in subsection a. of this section shall be guilty of a violation of N.J.S.2C:29-1. c.     The Attorney General shall issue guidelines or directives to effectuate the purposes of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, except the Attorney General may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.